Connecticut, session 2026, SB00339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 8-2 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 18 of public act 25-1 of the
November special session, is repealed and the following is substituted
in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) Zoning regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall not:
(1) (A) Prohibit the operation in a residential zone of any family child
care home or group child care home located in a residence, or (B) require
any special zoning permit or special zoning exception for such
operation;
(2) (A) Prohibit the use of receptacles for the storage of items
designated for recycling in accordance with section 22a-241b or require
that such receptacles comply with provisions for bulk or lot area, or
similar provisions, except provisions for side yards, rear yards and front
SB339 / File No. 129 1

SB339 File No. 129
yards; or (B) unreasonably restrict access to or the size of such
receptacles for businesses, given the nature of the business and the
volume of items designated for recycling in accordance with section 22a-
241b, that such business produces in its normal course of business,
provided nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit such
regulations from requiring the screening or buffering of such receptacles
for aesthetic reasons;
(3) Impose conditions and requirements on manufactured homes,
including mobile manufactured homes built in accordance with federal
manufactured home construction and safety standards or on lots
containing such manufactured homes, including mobile manufactured
home parks, if those conditions and requirements are substantially
different from conditions and requirements imposed on (A) single-
family dwellings; (B) lots containing single-family dwellings; or (C)
multifamily dwellings, lots containing multifamily dwellings, cluster
developments or planned unit developments;
(4) (A) Prohibit the continuance of any nonconforming use, building
or structure existing at the time of the adoption of such regulations; (B)
require a special permit or special exception for any such continuance;
(C) provide for the termination of any nonconforming use solely as a
result of nonuse for a specified period of time without regard to the
intent of the property owner to maintain that use; or (D) terminate or
deem abandoned a nonconforming use, building or structure unless the
property owner of such use, building or structure voluntarily
discontinues such use, building or structure and such discontinuance is
accompanied by an intent to not reestablish such use, building or
structure. The demolition or deconstruction of a nonconforming use,
building or structure shall not by itself be evidence of such property
owner's intent to not reestablish such use, building or structure;
(5) Prohibit the installation, in accordance with the provisions of
section 8-1bb, of temporary health care structures for use by mentally or
physically impaired persons if such structures comply with the
provisions of said section, unless the municipality opts out in
SB339 / File No. 129 2

SB339 File No. 129
accordance with the provisions of subsection (j) of said section;
(6) Prohibit the operation in a residential zone of any cottage food
operation, as defined in section 21a-62b;
(7) Establish for any dwelling unit a minimum floor area that is
greater than the minimum floor area set forth in the applicable building,
housing or other code;
(8) Place a fixed numerical or percentage cap on the number of
dwelling units that constitute multifamily housing over four units,
middle housing or mixed-use development that may be permitted in the
municipality;
(9) Require a minimum number of off-street motor vehicle parking
spaces for any residential development except as provided in section 8-
3n; [or]
(10) Be applied to deny any land use application, including for any
site plan approval, special permit, special exception or other zoning
approval, on the basis of (A) a district's character, unless such character
is expressly articulated in such regulations by clear and explicit physical
standards for site work and structures, or (B) the immutable
characteristics, source of income or income level of any applicant or end
user, other than age or disability whenever age-restricted or disability-
restricted housing may be permitted; or
(11) (A) Prohibit the rental for six months or more of up to three
bedrooms of a single-family dwelling in a residential zone that is the
primary residence of the owner-occupant, or (B) require any special
zoning permit or special zoning exception for such rental.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-2(d)
HSG Joint Favorable
SB339 / File No. 129 3

SB339 File No. 129
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill prohibits most municipal zoning regulations from banning
certain bedroom rentals in single-family homes and does not result in a
fiscal impact. The state is not a direct residential landlord.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB339 / File No. 129 4

SB339 File No. 129
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 339
AN ACT ALLOWING LONG-TERM RENTAL OF BEDROOMS IN A
SINGLE-FAMILY HOME AS OF RIGHT.